Hawaii, session 2025, SB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the agricultural industry in Hawaii has been significantly affected by climate change, globalization, the influx of devastating invasive species and diseases, market conditions, a lack of agricultural workers, and various other factors.  The legislature further finds that the State must modernize and adapt its policies and laws accordingly.  The legislature also finds that unnecessary or obsolete sections of the Hawaii Revised Statutes are impeding the growth and success of agriculture in Hawaii and should be carefully reviewed to ensure that this important part of the islands' economy and way of life can survive and thrive into the future. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a working group within the department of agriculture to review and make recommendations on amending or repealing unnecessary or obsolete laws pertaining to agriculture. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the department of agriculture a working group to review and make recommendations on amending or repealing unnecessary or obsolete laws pertaining to agriculture. (b)  The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)  The chairperson of the board of agriculture, or the chairperson's designee, who shall serve as the chairperson of the working group; (2)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources, or the chairperson's designee; (3)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism, or the director's designee; (4)  The executive director of the agribusiness development corporation, or the executive director's designee; (5)  A representative of the mayor of the city and county of Honolulu; (6)  A representative of the mayor of the county of Hawaii; (7)  A representative of the mayor of the county of Kauai; (8)  A representative of the mayor of the county of Maui; (9)  The executive director of the Hawaii Farm Bureau, who shall be invited by the chairperson of the working group; (10)  The executive director of the Hawaii Agriculture Research Center, who shall be invited by the chairperson of the working group; (11)  The managing director of the Hawaii Cattlemen's Council, who shall be invited by the chairperson of the working group; and (12)  The president of the Hawaii Farmers Union, or the president's designee, who shall be invited by the chairperson of the working group. (c)  The working group shall first review laws that directly impact agricultural viability and land use, including but not limited to: (1)  Restrictions on leases of state agricultural land that prohibit a residence on the property; (2)  Restrictions on leases of state agricultural land that prohibit the raising of poultry and swine on the property; (3)  Caps on agricultural operation loan rates; (4)  Regulations governing agricultural workforce development and farm labor access; (5)  Water access and permitting; and (6)  Procurement policies that impact the use of locally grown food in state institutions. (d)  The working group may identify and recommend additional laws for future review in subsequent legislative sessions. (e)  Members of the working group who are employed by the State and serving in their official capacity on the working group shall serve without compensation.  Other members of the working group who are not employed by the State shall receive compensation for their travel expenses. (f)  No later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026, the working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature regarding its review of unnecessary or obsolete laws pertaining to agriculture. (g)  The working group shall cease to exist on June 30, 2026. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the working group established pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.